Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1801
Real property taxes; collection by sale; when.

Except for delinquent taxes on mobile homes, cabin trailers, manufactured homes, or similar property assessed and taxed as improvements to leased land, all real estate on which the taxes shall not have been paid in full, as provided by law, on or before the first Monday of March, after they become delinquent, shall be subject to sale on or after such date.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 193, p. 459;

R.S.1913, § 6521;

C.S.1922, § 6049;

C.S.1929, § 77-2001;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 4, p. 518;

Laws 1937, c. 167, § 23, p. 655;

Laws 1939, c. 98, § 23, p. 442;

Laws 1941, c. 157, § 23, p. 626;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 77-2001;

R.S.1943, § 77-1801;

Laws 1986, LB 531, § 1;

Laws 2000, LB 968, § 70.